Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska70-733
Filing fees.

The Secretary of State shall charge and collect for (1) filing articles of incorporation and issuing a certificate of incorporation, three dollars; (2) filing of articles of amendment and issuing a certificate of amendment, two dollars; (3) filing articles of consolidation and issuing a certificate with respect thereto, ten dollars; and (4) filing articles of dissolution, five dollars.

Laws 1937, c. 50, § 29, p. 212;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 70-829;

R.S.1943, § 70-733.